South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3157.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 50-9-30(A)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2) a lifetime recreational license, "resident" means; (a) a United States citizen who has been domiciled in this State for one hundred eighty consecutive days or more immediately preceding the date of application; or (b) an adopted child upon approval of the adoption petition if the: (i) adoptive parents are South Carolina residents; and (ii) child's birth mother is or has been a legal South Carolina resident; SECTION 2.  Section 50-9-520 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (E) An adopted child who meets the residency requirements provided in Section 50-9-30(A)(2) may obtain a lifetime combination license at no cost. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----